en: Evaporator core type: Parallel flow (microchannel); Plate-fin; Serpentine; Tube-and-fin; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta jezgre isparivača: Paralelni protok (mikrokanalni); Pločasto-lamelni; Serpentina; Cijevasto-lamelni; Ostalo
fr: Type d’évaporateur de climatisation: Flux parallèle (microcanaux); À plaques et à ailettes; En serpentin; À tubes et à ailettes; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de núcleo do evaporador: Fluxo paralelo (microcanal); Placa e aleta; Serpentina; Tubo e aleta; Outros
el: Τύπος πυρήνα εξατμιστή: Παράλληλης ροής (μικροκανάλι); Με πλάκες και πτερύγια; Οφιοειδής; Με σωλήνες και πτερύγια; Άλλο
sl-SI: Tip jedra uparjalnika: Vzporedni pretok (mikrokanalni); S ploščatimi rebri; Serpentinasti; Cevasti z rebri; Drugo
de: Typ des Verdampferkerns: Parallelstrom (Mikrokanal); Plattenrippen; Schlangenrohr; Rohr-Rippen; Sonstiges
pl: Typ rdzenia parownika: O przepływie równoległym (mikrokanałowy); Płytkowo-żebrowy; Serpentynowy; Rurowo-żebrowy; Inny
sv: Förångarens kärntyp: Parallellflöde (mikrokanal); Plattfläns; Serpentin; Rör och fläns; Övrigt
lt-LT: Garintuvo šerdies tipas: Lygiagretaus srauto (mikrokanalų); Plokštelinis-briaunotas; Gyvatuko formos; Vamzdinis-briaunotas; Kita
nb: Fordamperkjernetype: Parallell strømning (mikrokanal); Platefinne; Serpentin; Rør og finne; Annet
bg-BG: Тип изпарителен (изпарителен радиатор) блок на климатичната система: Паралелен поток (микроканален); Пластинчато-оребрен; Серпентинен; Тръбно-оребрен; Други
tr: Evaporatör çekirdek türü: Paralel akışlı (mikro kanallı); Plakalı kanatçıklı; Serpantin; Borulu ve kanatçıklı; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul miezului evaporatorului: Flux paralel (microcanal); Plăci și aripioare; Serpentină; Tuburi și aripioare; Altele
ru: Тип испарителя: Параллельно-поточный (микроканальный); Пластинчато-ребристый; Змеевиковый; Трубчато-ребристый; Другое
fi: Höyrystimen kennon tyyppi: Rinnakkaisvirtaus (mikrokanava); Levy-ripa; Serpentiini; Putki-ripa; Muu
it: Tipo di nucleo dell'evaporatore: Flusso parallelo (microcanale); Piastra alettata; Serpentina; Tubi e alette; Altro
hu: Párologtató mag típusa: Párhuzamos áramlású (mikrocsatornás); Lemezbordás; Kígyócsöves; Csőbordás; Egyéb
zh-TW: 蒸發器芯體類型: 平行流 (微通道); 板翅式; 蛇管式; 管翅式; 其他
zh-CN: 蒸发器芯型: 平行流（微通道）; 板翅式; 蛇形; 管翅式; 其他
ja: 蒸発器コアタイプ: パラレルフロー (マイクロチャネル); プレートフィン; サーペンタイン; チューブアンドフィン; その他
cs: Typ jádra výparníku: Paralelní průtok (mikrokanál); Deskový lamelový; Hadovitý; Trubkový lamelový; Jiné
th: ประเภทแกนระเหย: ไหลขนาน (ไมโครแชนเนล); เพลตฟิน; คดเคี้ยว; ท่อและครีบ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ jadra výparníka: Paralelný tok (mikrokanálový); Doskovo-rebrový; Hadovitý; Rúrkovo-rebrový; Iné
vi: Loại lõi dàn bay hơi: Dòng chảy song song (vi kênh); Tấm cánh; Dạng ống xoắn; Ống - cánh; Khác
ko: 에바포레이터 코어 유형: 병렬 흐름(마이크로채널); 플레이트 핀; 서펜타인; 튜브 앤 핀; 기타
da: Fordamperkernetype: Parallelt flow (mikrokanal); Pladefinne; Serpentin; Rør og finne; Andet
nl: Verdamperkern type: Parallelle stroom (microkanaal); Plaat-vin; Serpentijn; Buis-en-vin; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de núcleo do evaporador: Fluxo paralelo (microcanal); Placas e aletas; Serpentina; Tubos e aletas; Outro
es: Tipo de núcleo del evaporador: Flujo paralelo (microcanal); Aleta de placa; Serpentín; Tubo y aleta; Otro